Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1526.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 531. Degraded natural gas pipeline prevention plans.(a) Commission duties.--The commission shall:(1) Establish a system to receive annual reports from natural gas distribution companies PUBLIC UTILITIES required under subsection (b) to issue a degraded natural gas pipeline prevention plan.(2) Prepare guidance for natural gas distribution companies PUBLIC UTILITIES on how to determine the integrity of their natural gas distribution systems.(3) Provide guidance on mitigating threats to existing Aldyl A polyethylene natural gas pipelines and other <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718 potentially compromised plastic pipelines.(4) Prescribe the methodology to be used by natural gas distribution companies PUBLIC UTILITIES to mitigate insufficient records necessary to identify each pipeline segment containing Aldyl A polyethylene piping.(5) Provide guidance to determine the placement of critical valves to ensure that natural gas distribution companies PUBLIC UTILITIES are considering potential risks, emergency response times and any threat to the nearby population.(6) Provide recommendations and best practices on the placement of critical valves.(b) Duty to issue plan.--Within one year after the effective date of this section, and every January 1 thereafter, a natural gas distribution company PUBLIC UTILITY operating in this Commonwealth shall issue to the commission a degraded natural gas pipeline prevention plan that contains:(1) An inventory of all Aldyl A polyethylene natural gas assets recording the following:(i) The age of the Aldyl A polyethylene natural gas asset.(ii) Any sign of degradation of a pipeline or junction.(iii) Potential local environmental threats, including increased room temperatures, other compromised systems in the building, the presence of steam or environmental factors that could degrade the natural gas asset.(iv) Any other information deemed necessary by the commission.20250HB1526PN2719 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Procedures for:(i) Notification to building owners of all Aldyl A polyethylene natural gas assets that are located in elevated temperature environments that could be subject to degradation and schedule the replacement of those natural gas assets.(ii) Scheduling the replacement of any Aldyl A polyethylene natural gas asset that could pose a risk of failure due to factors other than local environmental threats.(iii) Replacing or remediating every early vintage Aldyl A polyethylene connections that use Polyoxymethylene inserts.(iv) Reporting on the replacement or mitigation of Aldyl A polyethylene natural gas assets.(v) Monitoring noncompromised Aldyl A polyethylene natural gas assets and replace if merited.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Natural gas asset." A pipeline, junction, valve, meter or other component used to deliver natural gas."Natural gas distribution company." As defined in section 2202 (relating to definitions)."NATURAL GAS PUBLIC UTILITY." FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE TERM SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING, AS APPLICABLE:(1) A CITY NATURAL GAS DISTRIBUTION OPERATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 102 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS).(2) A PUBLIC UTILITY AS DEFINED IN SECTION 102 LIMITED TO A PUBLIC UTILITY OWNING OR OPERATING IN THIS COMMONWEALTH 20250HB1526PN2719 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EQUIPMENT OR FACILITIES FOR TRANSMITTING, DISTRIBUTING OR FURNISHING NATURAL OR ARTIFICIAL GAS TO OR FOR THE PUBLIC FOR COMPENSATION.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1526PN2719 - 4 - 1234